Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-170] Presumption of jurisdiction.
The jurisdiction of the military courts and boards established by this chapter
shall be presumed and the burden of proof rests on any person seeking to oust
those courts or boards of jurisdiction in any action or proceeding. [L 1982, c
171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next